Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1804
Failure to cease making misrepresentation; action by director.

If after thirty days following the giving of the notice mentioned in section 44-1803 such insurer has failed to cease making, issuing, or circulating such false misrepresentations or causing the same to be made, issued, or circulated in this state and if the director has reason to believe that a proceeding by him or her in respect to such matters would be to the interest of the public and that such insurer is issuing or delivering contracts of insurance to residents of this state or collecting premiums on such contracts or doing any of the acts enumerated in section 44-1805, he or she shall take action against such insurer under the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1965, c. 247, § 4, p. 699;

Laws 1989, LB 6, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 28.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.